Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201666-1418
Trip permits; issuance; fees.

A trip permit shall be issued before any person required to obtain a trip permit enters this state. The trip permit shall be issued by the director through Internet sales from the department's web site. The trip permit shall be issued for a fee of twenty dollars and shall be valid for a period of seventy-two hours. The fee collected by the director shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Cash Fund.

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 63;

Laws 2013, LB250, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB667, § 1.
July 21, 2016